installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
acetolyza/ZQ
adresace/Z
afghanstina/ZQ
agogika/ZQ
akademie/Z
akumulace/Z
alergologie/Z
allotransplantace/Z
Amalie/Z
amnesie/Z
anarchokomunistka/ZQ
anemie/Z
Anicka/ZQ
antenka/ZQ
Antiochie/Z
apanaz/Z
Arabie/Z
archivarka/ZQ
arteterapie/Z
asociativita/ZQ
Asyrie/Z
audience/Z
autoafektace/Z
autolakovna/ZQ
autosluzba/ZQ
axiolozka/ZQ
backorka/ZQ
bakterolozka/ZQ
bandoneonistka/ZQ
Barmanka/ZQ
bastyrka/ZQ
bedla/ZQ
belka/ZQ
berneska/ZQ
bezrucka/ZQ
bilabiala/ZQ
biografie/Z
biorytmologie/Z
blastula/ZQ
boa/ZQ
boka/ZQ
Borovnicka/ZQ
bradavka/ZQ
Bretan/Z
brouckiada/ZQ
brekyne/ZQ
Bukovka/ZQ
bylina/ZQ
castristka/ZQ
centralistka/ZQ
ciganka/ZQ
Cislajtanie/Z
conquista/ZQ
cykloturistika/ZQ
carodejka/ZQ
cepice/ZQ
cicorka/ZQ
cmouha/ZQ
ctyraktovka/ZQ
Dacie/Z
Darina/ZQ
debutantka/ZQ
defragmentace/Z
deklarantka/ZQ
delokalizace/Z
demontaz/Z
depistaz/Z
desetidolarovka/ZQ
detailizace/Z
deviza/ZQ
diagonala/ZQ
difrakce/Z
dipozice/ZQ
disparita/ZQ
divize/Z
Dobruska/ZQ
doktorandka/ZQ
donkichotiada/ZQ
dovrsitelka/ZQ
draslovka/ZQ
droga/ZQ
drvostepka/ZQ
dubohabrina/ZQ
dvacetiminutovka/ZQ
dvojtecka/ZQ
dymnice/ZQ
ebonologie/Z
ekonomie/Z
elektroda/ZQ
elevace/Z
emocionalita/ZQ
entomolozka/ZQ
erekce/Z
estakada/ZQ
etnomuzikolozka/ZQ
Evelina/ZQ
existencialistka/ZQ
expodnikatelka/ZQ
fabricka/ZQ
fangle/Z
Fatra/ZQ
fenoloxigenaza/ZQ
Filadelfie/Z
finstina/ZQ
florbalistka/ZQ
formace/Z
fotogalerie/Z
fragmentace/Z
frekventantka/ZQ
funkcionalita/ZQ
fyzioterapeutka/ZQ
galvanotechnika/ZQ
gazela/ZQ
geologie/Z
Gisela/ZQ
gnose/Z
granda/ZQ
Guinejka/ZQ
hadimrska/ZQ
hanba/ZQ
Havana/ZQ
hemolymfa/ZQ
hibernace/Z
hlasistka/ZQ
hluchota/ZQ
Holandanka/ZQ
homologace/Z
hospitalisace/Z
houzev/Z
Hrcava/ZQ
hrebikarna/ZQ
huriska/ZQ
hydrogenace/Z
hyperaktivace/Z
hypotenze/Z
chatka/ZQ
chmurka/ZQ
chranenka/ZQ
chuliganka/ZQ
identifikace/Z
iluze/Z
imunohistochemie/Z
induktance/Z
iniciativa/ZQ
institucionalizace/Z
interjekce/Z
intuice/ZQ
iredentistka/ZQ
Ithaka/ZQ
jadrovina/ZQ
Jarka/ZQ
jednice/ZQ
jerabina/ZQ
jimka/ZQ
jizdenka/ZQ
Julinka/ZQ
Kadan/Z
kalamajka/ZQ
kambala/ZQ
kanalka/ZQ
kapenka/ZQ
kapsulka/ZQ
Karenina/ZQ
kartounka/ZQ
Kataranka/ZQ
kavalirka/ZQ
keratektomie/Z
klaka/ZQ
Kleopatra/ZQ
klistky/ZQ
kniha/ZQ
koexistence/Z
kolbenka/ZQ
kolobezka/ZQ
komediantka/ZQ
komplementarita/ZQ
koncese/Z
kongregace/Z
konstanta/ZQ
kontrarevoluce/Z
konzerva/ZQ
koprovka/ZQ
koroptev/Z
kosmonautka/ZQ
kotelna/ZQ
koza/ZQ
kraksna/ZQ
kravinka/ZQ
kriminalistika/ZQ
krosna/ZQ
krypta/ZQ
krizala/ZQ
kucharinka/ZQ
kuna/ZQ
kuravka/ZQ
kvartetistka/ZQ
kyfoza/ZQ
laborantka/ZQ
lakota/ZQ
laostina/ZQ
latina/ZQ
lednice/ZQ
lektorka/ZQ
letargie/Z
liana/ZQ
Libyjka/ZQ
liliputanka/ZQ
lisovna/ZQ
livrej/Z
lokace/Z
louc/Z
lucerna/ZQ
lustrace/Z
lyze/Z
magie/Z
majorizace/Z
malajstina/ZQ
maluvka/ZQ
Manicka/ZQ
marasca/ZQ
marodka/ZQ
mastickarka/ZQ
maticka/ZQ
mazanina/ZQ
mechanicka/ZQ
meningitida/ZQ
metakritika/ZQ
metraz/Z
micovna/ZQ
mikroinstrukce/Z
milicionarka/ZQ
miniaturistka/ZQ
miriada/ZQ
mladeznice/ZQ
mobilizace/Z
Mohelka/ZQ
monografie/Z
morena/ZQ
motivace/Z
mrcha/ZQ
mulatka/ZQ
muzikologie/Z
mysicka/ZQ
nadenice/ZQ
nadtrida/ZQ
nalada/ZQ
napln/Z
Nasavrky/ZQ
nauka/ZQ
Nebraska/ZQ
nemocnicka/ZQ
nervoza/ZQ
neuropsychologie/Z
Nigeranka/ZQ
nizozemstina/ZQ
normohodina/ZQ
novinarina/ZQ
nulita/ZQ
obetiste/ZQ
obleva/ZQ
obryne/ZQ
octomilka/ZQ
odlevarna/ZQ
odrezavacka/ZQ
oftalmologie/Z
okarina/ZQ
Olesenka/ZQ
omitacka/ZQ
opatrovnice/ZQ
oprat/Z
organela/ZQ
ortografie/Z
osmdesatnice/ZQ
ostroretka/ZQ
otocka/ZQ
ozdoba/ZQ
padesatnice/ZQ
paleontolozka/ZQ
pandzabstina/ZQ
papirka/ZQ
paraplegie/Z
paroznatka/ZQ
pasovka/ZQ
paternalistka/ZQ
paveda/ZQ
pecovatelka/ZQ
penalizace/Z
perfekcionistka/ZQ
permanentka/ZQ
perverze/Z
petina/ZQ
picka/ZQ
pilnice/ZQ
pisen/Z
pizmovka/ZQ
plasma/KZQ
plejada/ZQ
plnicka/ZQ
plynarna/ZQ
podebradka/ZQ
podnabidka/ZQ
podsit/Z
poetizace/Z
pointa/ZQ
Polanka/ZQ
polka/ZQ
polosvestka/ZQ
pomlka/ZQ
populistka/ZQ
poradatelka/ZQ
postylka/ZQ
potvrzenka/ZQ
pozemstanka/ZQ
pragmatistka/ZQ
praslovanstina/ZQ
prebenda/ZQ
presumpce/Z
probirka/ZQ
prohlizecka/ZQ
promlka/ZQ
prosevacka/ZQ
protialiance/Z
protuberance/Z
prudusnice/ZQ
prvouka/ZQ
prednice/ZQ
preformulace/Z
prepona/ZQ
prezdivka/ZQ
prilozka/ZQ
prispevatelka/ZQ
pseudosfera/ZQ
psychopatolozka/ZQ
puklina/ZQ
pupava/ZQ
raabizace/Z
radiostanice/ZQ
rachota/ZQ
Raspenava/ZQ
reaustenitizace/Z
reedice/ZQ
rehelenizace/Z
rekordmanka/ZQ
reminiscence/Z
replika/ZQ
respondentka/ZQ
revise/Z
ribosa/ZQ
rohovina/ZQ
Romka/ZQ
routka/ZQ
rozkryvka/ZQ
Rozsicka/ZQ
rudoarmejka/ZQ
rusovlaska/ZQ
rybicka/ZQ
rytirka/ZQ
repa/ZQ
Saba/ZQ
Salvadoranka/ZQ
samozasobitelka/ZQ
satisfakce/Z
scenaristka/ZQ
sebeobsluha/ZQ
sedmacka/ZQ
sekerka/ZQ
semiolozka/ZQ
septikemie/Z
severoamericanka/ZQ
schuzka/ZQ
Silvie/Z
sitaristka/ZQ
skazka/ZQ
sklovina/ZQ
skrin/Z
Slavia/ZQ
sliva/ZQ
slozka/ZQ
smetanka/ZQ
snemovna/ZQ
Sodoma/ZQ
sonatina/ZQ
soupiska/ZQ
sparovacka/ZQ
spiritistka/ZQ
spoludrzitelka/ZQ
sportovkyne/ZQ
srbocharvatstina/ZQ
Stanislava/ZQ
stavarka/ZQ
stereoskopie/Z
stojina/ZQ
stranicka/ZQ
strouhanka/ZQ
stremcha/ZQ
Studnice/ZQ
subkomponenta/ZQ
sugestibilita/ZQ
superplasticita/ZQ
svacina/ZQ
svetlovlaska/ZQ
svobodnice/ZQ
syndikalizace/Z
systemizace/Z
Sarka/ZQ
Seherezada/ZQ
sibalka/ZQ
skala/ZQ
skvirecka/ZQ
snura/ZQ
spina/ZQ
stenice/ZQ
stolba/ZQ
svejkovina/ZQ
tajenka/ZQ
tara/ZQ
teatralistika/ZQ
televise/Z
teplolecba/ZQ
termoelektrotechnika/ZQ
textilka/ZQ
Timoranka/ZQ
tlacenka/ZQ
tonalita/ZQ
toskanstina/ZQ
trakce/Z
transpozice/ZQ
trepanace/Z
trikolora/ZQ
trosecnice/ZQ
trznice/ZQ
tricetina/ZQF
tubicka/ZQ
tuzba/ZQ
Tyrolka/ZQ
ufolozka/ZQ
ukolebavka/ZQ
unava/ZQ
upravna/ZQ
uschovatelka/ZQ
uvadecka/ZQ
vafle/Z
valuace/Z
vaskularizace/Z
vecicka/ZQ
velerada/ZQ
venetstina/ZQ
Veruska/ZQ
veticka/ZQ
videokamera/ZQ
Vilma/ZQ
virtualizace/Z
vizaz/Z
vlasovka/ZQ
voda/ZQ
volitelka/ZQ
vrana/Z
vretenuska/ZQ
vycpavka/ZQ
vychlipenina/ZQ
vyluka/ZQ
vyrazka/ZQ
vystrihovanka/ZQ
vyvazovacka/ZQ
vzducholod/ZI
Yvona/ZQ
zahumenka/ZQ
zalozka/ZQ
zaprazka/ZQ
zastavka/ZQ
zavarka/ZQ
zbrojnice/ZQ
zelinka/ZQ
zkazka/ZQ
zmijovka/ZQ
zpatecka/ZQ
zrzohlavka/ZQ
zvlastnustka/ZQ
zanristka/ZQ
zemlicka/ZQ
zirafa/ZQ
Zofka/ZQ
